Utah statutes.
63G-13-301.   Migrant Worker Visa Pilot Project.

(1)  With the assistance of the attorney general, and subject to Section 63G-13-302, the governor may negotiate and enter into a memorandum of understanding with the government of the State of Nuevo Leon, Mexico, through its Migrant Attention Center to create a pilot project known as the "Migrant Worker Visa Pilot Project" under which Utah businesses may obtain legal foreign migrant workers through use of United States nonimmigrant visas.

(2)  The commission shall recommend to the Legislature and the governor policies and programs that will educate, encourage, support, and facilitate Utah businesses in need of nonimmigrant temporary workers to participate in the pilot project.

